Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 2.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201013-2601
Act, how cited.

Sections 13-2601 to 13-2613 shall be known and
may be cited as the Convention Center Facility Financing Assistance Act.

Laws 1999, LB 382, § 1;

Laws 2010, LB779, § 2.
July 1, 2010
Limitation on applications, see section 13-2612.